nl: Ontwerp tochtstrip: Vlak; Rond; Andere
ja: ウェザーストリップの種類: フラット; ラウンド; その他
zh-CN: 挡风雨条设计: 扁平的; 圆头; 其他
nb: Design av værlister: Flat; Rund; Annet
ko: 문풍지 디자인: 플랫; 라운드; 기타
hr-HR: Dizajn brtvene trake: Ravna; Okrugla; Ostalo
ru: Конструкция уплотнителя окон/дверей: Плоский; Круглый; Другой
sv: Fönsterlistutförande: Platt; Rund; Övrigt
fi: Tiivistenauhan muotoilu: Tasainen; Pyöreä; Muu
en: Weather strip design: Flat; Round; Other
el: Σχέδιο μονωτικής ταινίας κουφωμάτων: Επίπεδη; Στρογγυλό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Formato de faixa meteorológica: Plana; Redondo; Outro
sk-SK: Konštrukcia poveternostného pásu: Rovný; Okrúhly; Iné
es: Diseño de burletes: Puro; Redondo; Otros
bg-BG: Дизайн на изолираща лента: Плосък; Кръгъл; Други
vi: Thiết kế dải thời tiết: Phẳng; Mũi giày tròn; Khác
fr: Conception de coupe-froid: Plate; Rond; Autre
th: การออกแบบแผ่นกันสาด: ราบ; ทรงกลม; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Design garnitură de etanșare: Plată; Rotundă; Altele
tr: Hava şeridi tasarımı: Düz; Yuvarlak; Diğer
sl-SI: Zasnova tesnjenja pred vremenskimi vplivi: Ploščata; Okrogla; Drugo
it: Design della guarnizione isolante: Piatto; Rotondo; Altro
lt-LT: Sandarinimo juostelės dizainas: Plokščia; Apvali; Kita
hu: Tömítőszalag kialakítása: Lapos; Kerek; Egyéb
pl: Projekt taśmy uszczelniającej: Płaski; Runda; Inne
de: Design des Dichtungsstreifens: Flach; Rund; Sonstiges
cs: Design těsnicího pásku: Plochý; Oválná; Jiné
pt-PT: Design de vedação de frinchas: Plano; Redondo; Outro
da: Vejrdesign: Flad; Rund; Andet
zh-TW: 擋風雨條設計: 平坦; 圓頭; 其他